Illinois, session 104th, HB1074.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 502.2 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/502.2 new)7    Sec. 502.2. Fees for electronic filing prohibited.8    (a) It shall be unlawful for an income tax return preparer 9or a software company to charge a separate fee for the 10electronic filing of returns under this Act. It shall also be 11unlawful for a software company to offer for sale a version of 12its tax software that charges a separate fee for the 13electronic filing of returns under this Act and a version of 14the same tax software that does not. 15    (b) Any income tax return preparer or software company 16that violates this Section is liable for a civil penalty of 17$500 for the first violation and $1,000 for each succeeding 18violation. Each fee that is charged on or after the effective 19date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly in 20violation of this Section by an income tax return preparer and 21each fee that is charged in violation of this Section through 22the use of tax software that is offered for sale on or after 23the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General   HB1074- 2 -LRB104 05871 HLH 15902 b1Assembly by a software company shall constitute a separate 2violation. The civil penalties imposed by this Section shall 3be paid to the Department upon notice and demand and shall be 4assessed, collected, and paid in the same manner as taxes 5under this Act. 6    (c) All final administrative decisions of the Department 7under this Section shall be subject to judicial review 8pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Review Law. 9Proceedings for judicial review shall be commenced in the 10circuit court of the county in which the party applying for 11review resides, except that, if the party is not a resident of 12this State, the venue shall be in Sangamon County or Cook 13County. 14    (d) As used in this Section: 15    "Administrative decision" has the meaning given to that 16term in Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 17    "Income tax return preparer" has the meaning given to that 18term in Section 1501. 19    "Software company" means a developer of tax software. 20    "Tax software" means any computer software program 21intended for tax return preparation purposes, including, but 22not limited to, an off-the-shelf software program loaded onto 23a tax return preparer's or taxpayer's computer or an online 24tax preparation application.